Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-391
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 83-108 and 83-391 to 83-393, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services; and

(2) Facility means a skilled nursing care or intermediate care facility.

Laws 1973, LB 536, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 955;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 92.